Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Enhance
Workforce Development and Training Opportunities for Emerging
Industries in Oklahoma Act".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11278 TKR 01/03/25





Req. No. 11278 Page 1